New Mexico, session 2026, SB81.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION.--Twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the department of finance and administration for expenditure in fiscal year 2027 and subsequent fiscal years for the New Mexico finance authority to carry out the purposes of the Primary Care Capital Funding Act. Any unexpended or unencumbered balance remaining at the end of a fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund. .232558.1SA